Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1814
Action of commission; review.

Any action of the commission pursuant to the State Natural Gas Regulation Act is subject to review in accordance with section 75-136.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 14.